District of Columbia statutes.
31-4427

Salaries to be authorized by directors.

No domestic company shall pay any salary, compensation, or emolument to any officer, trustee, or director thereof, amounting in any 1 year to more than $5,000, unless such payment shall be authorized by the board of directors of the company.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1151, ch. 672, ch. III, § 27
Hospital and medical services corporation, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
This section is referenced in § 31-3503.
1981 Ed., § 35-627.
1973 Ed., § 35-527.